Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEGACY COORDINATION NETWORK EDUCATION FUND.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for grants to Legacy Coordination Network Education Fund for programming related to Minnesota African Diaspora Black History month and for educational outreach activities to teach youth and the general public about the historical and cultural contributions of African-heritage communities in Minnesota. new text end